Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 238A.400, as  amended by section 9, chapter 75, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended
to read:
238A.400. (1) Upon retirement on or after  the earliest retirement date, as described in ORS
238A.165, a member of the  individual account program shall receive in a lump sum the amounts in
the member’s employee account, rollover account and employer account  to the extent the member
is vested in those accounts under ORS 238A.320.
(2) In lieu of a lump sum payment under subsection (1) of  this section, a member of the indi-
vidual account program may elect to receive  the amounts in the member’s employee account and
employer account, to the extent the member is vested in those accounts under ORS 238A.320, in
substantially equal  installments paid over a period of 5, 10, 15 or 20 years, or over a period that is
equal to the anticipated life span of the member as actuarially determined  by the Public Employees
Retirement Board. Installments may be made on a monthly, quarterly or annual basis.  In no event
may the period selected by the member exceed the time allowed by the  minimum distribution re-
quirements described in subsection (5) of this section. The board shall by rule establish the  manner
in which installments will be adjusted to reflect investment gains and losses on  the unpaid balance
during the payout period elected by the member  under this subsection. The board by rule may es-
tablish minimum monthly amounts payable under this subsection. The board may  require that a
lump sum payment, or an installment schedule different than the schedules  provided for in this
subsection, be used to pay the vested amounts  in the member’s accounts if those amounts are not
adequate to generate the minimum monthly amounts specified by the rule.
(3) A member of the individual account program electing  to receive installments under sub-
section (2) of  this section must designate a beneficiary or beneficiaries. In the event the member dies
before all amounts in  the employee and vested employer accounts are paid, [ all remaining installment
payments shall be made ] the remaining account balance  shall be paid in a lump sum distrib-
ution to the beneficiary or beneficiaries designated by the member. [ A beneficiary may elect to re-
ceive a lump sum distribution of the remaining amounts. ]
(4) A member who  is entitled to receive retirement benefits under ORS chapter 238 may receive
vested amounts in the member’s employee account, rollover account  and employer account in the
Enrolled Senate Bill 852 (SB 852-INTRO) Page 1
manner provided by  this section when the member retires for service under the provisions of ORS
chapter  238.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 238A.300 to 238A.415, the entire  interest of a
member of the individual  account program must be distributed over a time period commencing no
later than the latest retirement date set forth in ORS 238A.170, and  must be distributed in a manner
that satisfies all other  minimum distribution requirements of 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9) and regulations im-
plementing that section, as in effect on January 1, 2024. The board shall adopt rules implementing
those minimum distribution requirements.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 238.405 is amended to read:
238.405. (1)  The surviving spouse or child of a police officer or firefighter, who died a member
of the Public Employees Retirement System while retired either for service or disability and while
receiving or being entitled to receive a benefit under ORS 238.345 or  under this chapter, is entitled
to a benefit under this section. The benefit shall be equal to  25 percent of the unmodified retirement
allowance the police officer or firefighter was  receiving or was entitled to receive at the time of
death under ORS  238.345 or under this chapter. The benefit authorized by this section is in addition
to any other benefit the surviving spouse or child is entitled to and  is available to the child until
the child attains 18 years of age.
(2) For the purpose of this section, the unmodified retirement allowance is that allowance de-
scribed in ORS 238.300, or if election to receive the benefits authorized under ORS 238.345 has been
made, the unmodified retirement allowance is 50 percent of the final average  salary of the police
officer or firefighter as determined on the date of the injury causing disability.
(3) The board shall pay to a surviving spouse or child entitled to a benefit under this section a
lump sum amount equal to the actuarial value of the allowance  provided under this section if the
allowance is less than [ $30] $200 per month.  The lump sum amount shall be in lieu of the allowance
provided for under this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 238A.190 is amended to read:
238A.190. (1) Before the effective date of retirement of a member of the pension program,  the
member may elect to convert  the pension calculated under ORS 238A.180 or 238A.185 into the
actuarial equivalent pension as follows:
(a) A pension payable monthly during  the member’s life and, after the death of the member,
continuing at the same monthly amount for the life of a beneficiary named by  the member in a
written designation filed with the Public Employees Retirement Board at the time of election.
(b) A pension payable monthly during the member’s life  and, subject to modification under sub-
section (2) of this section, after the death of the member,  continuing at the same monthly amount
for the life of a beneficiary named by the member in a written designation filed with the  board at
the time of election.
(c) A pension payable monthly during the member’s life and, after the  death of the member,
continuing  at  one-half of the monthly amount paid to the member for the life of a beneficiary named
by the member in a written designation filed with the board at the time of election.
(d) A pension payable monthly during the member’s life  and, subject to modification under sub-
section (2) of this section, after the death of the member, continuing at one-half of the monthly
amount paid to the member  for the life of a beneficiary named by the member in a written desig-
nation filed with the board at the time of election.
(2) A retired member who elects to receive a pension under subsection  (1)(b) or (d) of this sec-
tion shall receive the pension that the member would have  received on the effective date of retire-
ment under ORS 238A.180 or 238A.185 adjusted by the actual amount  of any cost-of-living or other
post-retirement adjustments made to the original allowance since the  effective date of retirement,
if:
(a) The spouse or other beneficiary dies after the member retires; or
(b) The marriage relationship [ or other relationship ] with the beneficiary is terminated  after the
member retires.
Enrolled Senate Bill 852 (SB 852-INTRO) Page 2
(3) An increased  benefit under subsection (2) of this section is first effective on the first day of
the month following the date on which one of the events specified in subsection (2) of this section
occurs.
(4) If a member of the pension program is  married on the effective date of retirement, or there
exists any other person on the effective date of retirement who  is constitutionally required to be
treated in  the same manner as a spouse for the purpose of retirement benefits, the pension payable
to the member shall be as provided  in subsection (1)(c) of this section with the spouse or other
person as beneficiary, unless:
(a) The member has selected a different pension  provided for in subsection (1) of this section
with the spouse or other person as beneficiary; or
(b) The member  submits to the board a document signed by the spouse or other person, ac-
knowledged by a notary public, consenting to a different option or a different beneficiary.
(5) Subsection (4) of this section does not apply to a pension benefit that is paid in a lump sum
under ORS 238A.195.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 238.400 is amended to read:
238.400. [If a person who is a member of the system, who has attained normal retirement age and
who has retired from service, dies without making an election under ORS 238.305 and prior to the
expiration of the time within  which such an election could be made by the person, and the records of
the Public Employees Retirement Board indicate that  the person has designated the surviving spouse
as the beneficiary under ORS 238.390 (1), such ] If a member of the  system, who has attained
normal retirement age and has retired from service, dies prior to the expiration of the time
an election could be made by the member to change the member’s  service retirement benefit
option under ORS 238.305, and the records of the Public  Employees Retirement Board indi-
cate that the member’s surviving  spouse is the member’s beneficiary under ORS 238.390, the
surviving spouse may, not more than 60 days after the date of  the death of such deceased member,
elect to receive the  amount referred to in ORS 238.390 [ (1)], or elect Option 2 or Option 3 under
ORS 238.305 and designate  self as the beneficiary thereunder with the same force and effect as if
the election and designation had been properly made by the deceased member.
Passed by Senate February 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 852 (SB 852-INTRO) Page 3